California, session 20252026, AB1238.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Energy Consumer Freedom Act. SEC. 2. Section 43013.4 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:43013.4. (a) A state agency or local government, including a charter city, shall not adopt or enforce a rule, regulation, resolution, or ordinance that directly or indirectly results in prohibiting the buying, selling, or use of gasoline-powered vehicles or equipment.(b) The Legislature finds and declares that this section addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this section applies to all cities, including charter cities.SECTION 1.SEC. 3. Section 25969 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25969. (a) A state agency or local government, including a charter city, shall not adopt or enforce a rule, regulation, resolution, or ordinance, including, but not limited to, an ordinance prohibiting natural gas hookups for new buildings, that directly or indirectly results in prohibiting the use of gas stoves appliances in residential or nonresidential buildings.(b) The Legislature finds and declares that this section addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this section applies to all cities, including charter cities.